src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k5_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bóndi
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: bónda
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: bónda
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: bónda
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: bøndur
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: bøndur
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [bóndum, bóndrum]
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: bónda
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: bóndin
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: bóndan
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: bóndanum
    bóndi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: bóndans
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: bøndurnir
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: bøndurnar
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [bóndunum, bóndrunum]
    bóndi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: bóndanna
